sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta naprave: Akcijska kamera; Prenosni DVD-predvajalnik; Pametni telefon; Tablični računalnik; Zaslon/video monitor za vozilo; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de dispositivo compatível: Câmara de ação; Leitor de DVD portátil; Smartphone; Tablet; Ecrã/monitor de vídeo de veículo; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo įrenginys: Veiksmo kamera; Nešiojamasis DVD grotuvas; Išmanusis telefonas; Planšetinis kompiuteris; Automobilinis vaizdo monitorius / ekranas; Kita
nl: Compatibel apparaattype: Actioncamera; Draagbare dvd-speler; Smartphone; Tablet; Voertuigvideomonitor/-scherm; Overig
zh-CN: 兼容设备类型: 运动相机; 便携式 DVD 播放器; 智能手机; 平板电脑; 车载视频显示器/屏幕; 其他
ko: 호환 장치 유형: 액션 카메라; 휴대용 DVD 플레이어; 스마트폰; 태블릿; 차량용 비디오 모니터/스크린; 기타
fi: Yhteensopiva laitetyyppi: Actionkamera; Kannettava DVD-soitin; Älypuhelin; Tabletti; Ajoneuvon videonäyttö/ruutu; Muu
bg-BG: Съвместим тип устройство: Екшън камера; Преносим DVD плейър; Смартфон; Таблет; Автомобилен видео монитор/екран; Друго
fr: Type d'appareil compatible: Caméra d’action; Lecteur DVD portable; Téléphone intelligent; Tablette; Moniteur / écran vidéo de véhicule; Autre
tr: Uyumlu cihaz türü: Aksiyon kamerası; Taşınabilir DVD oynatıcı; Akıllı telefon; Tablet; Araç video monitörü/ekranı; Diğer
pl: Zgodny typ urządzenia: Kamera sportowa; Przenośny odtwarzacz DVD; Smartfon; Tablet; Monitor/ekran samochodowy; Inne
it: Tipo di dispositivo compatibile: Action cam; Lettore DVD portatile; Smartphone; Tablet; Monitor/schermo video per veicoli; Altro
sv: Kompatibel enhetstyp: Actionkamera; Bärbar DVD-spelare; Smarttelefon; Surfplatta; Videomonitor/skärm för fordon; Annat
de: Kompatibler Gerätetyp: Actionkamera; Tragbarer DVD-Player; Smartphone; Tablet; Fahrzeug-Videomonitor/-Bildschirm; Sonstige
el: Συμβατός τύπος συσκευής: Κάμερα δράσης; Φορητό DVD player; Smartphone; Tablet; Οθόνη/μόνιτορ βίντεο οχήματος; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de dispositivo compatível: Câmera de ação; Aparelho de DVD portátil; Smartphone; Tablet; Monitor/tela de vídeo veicular; Outro
es: Tipo de dispositivo compatible: Cámara de acción; Reproductor de DVD portátil; Teléfono inteligente; Tablet; Monitor/pantalla de video para vehículos; Otro
zh-TW: 相容裝置類型: 運動攝影機; 可攜式 DVD 播放機; 智慧型手機; 平板電腦; 車載視訊顯示器/螢幕; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de dispozitiv compatibil: Cameră de acțiune; DVD player portabil; Smartphone; Tabletă; Monitor/ecran video pentru vehicul; Altele
en: Compatible device type: Action camera; Portable DVD player; Smartphone; Tablet; Vehicle video monitor/screen; Other
ru: Совместимый тип устройства: Экшн-камера; Портативный DVD-плеер; Смартфон; Планшет; Автомобильный видеомонитор/экран; Другое
da: Kompatibel enhedstype: Actionkamera; Bærbar dvd-afspiller; Smartphone; Tablet; Videomonitor/-skærm til køretøj; Andet
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: กล้องแอ็กชัน; เครื่องเล่นดีวีดีพกพา; สมาร์ทโฟน; แท็บเล็ต; จอมอนิเตอร์/จอวิดีโอติดรถยนต์; อื่นๆ
ja: 対応デバイスタイプ: アクションカメラ; ポータブルDVDプレーヤー; スマートフォン; タブレット; 車載ビデオモニター / 画面; その他
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta uređaja: Akcijska kamera; Prijenosni DVD reproduktor; Pametni telefon; Tablet; Video monitor/zaslon za vozilo; Ostalo
vi: Loại thiết bị tương thích: Camera hành động; Đầu đĩa DVD di động; Điện thoại thông minh; Máy tính bảng; Màn hình/màn hình video trên xe; Khác
nb: Kompatibel enhetstype: Actionkamera; Bærbar DVD-spiller; Smarttelefon; Nettbrett; Videomonitor/skjerm til kjøretøy; Annet
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ zariadenia: Akčná kamera; Prenosný DVD prehrávač; Smartfón; Tablet; Video monitor/obrazovka do vozidla; Iné
cs: Typ kompatibilního zařízení: Akční kamera; Přenosný DVD přehrávač; Smartphone; Tablet; Obrazovka / video monitor do vozidla; Jiné
hu: Kompatibilis eszköz típusa: Akciókamera; Hordozható DVD-lejátszó; Okostelefon; Táblagép; Jármű videómonitor/képernyő; Egyéb